Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1604 Designation of school impact
districts. (a) The board shall designate a school impact district for
school impact fees only after holding at least one public hearing in the area
proposed for the school impact district. The written analysis, prepared in
accordance with subsection (b), shall be made available to the public at least
thirty days prior to the public hearing. Notice of the public hearing shall be
made as provided in section 1‑28.5. The notice shall include a map of
the proposed school impact district and the date, time, and place of the public
hearing.

(b) Prior to the designation of a school
impact district, the department shall prepare a written analysis that contains
the following:

(1) A map and legend describing the boundaries of the
proposed school impact district area, which may range from one school to one or
more high school complexes, as well as maps and legends describing surrounding
districts and school enrollments at existing school facilities in and around
the school impact district;

(2) The need to construct new or expand existing
school facilities in the proposed school impact
district area within the next twenty-five years to accommodate projected
growth in the area based on various state and county land use, demographics,
growth, density, and other applicable historical
data projections and plans;

(3) An analysis to determine appropriate student
generation rates by dwelling unit type for all new residential developments in
the school impact district area to provide the basis for determining the steady
state enrollment generated by new residential developments that will need to be
accommodated. The analysis shall also consider enrollment at existing school
facilities, in and around the school impact district;

(4) Student generation rates, based on full build-out
of the developments when student generation rates are anticipated to be in a
steady state mode;

(5) An analysis to estimate the number of students
generated by all new residential developments in the school impact district at
the point in time when the total enrollment from these developments is
anticipated to peak. This information is required for or related to the
determination of the impact fee, and will provide the basis for determining the
maximum enrollment generated by new residential developments that will need to
be accommodated in both permanent facilities and portable buildings;

(6) Calculation of the current statewide level of
service;

(7) An analysis of appropriate school land area, or
other appropriate state lands, and enrollment capacity, which may include
nontraditional (i.e., mid-rise or high-rise structures) facilities to
accommodate the need for public school facilities in high-growth areas within
existing urban developments;

(8) A statewide classroom use report, which shall
include the following:

(A) Current design enrollment per school
(i.e., maximum number of students per classroom per school);

(B) Current total student enrollment per
school; and

(C) Current number of classrooms not being
used for active teaching; and

(9) An analysis including the advantages and
disadvantages of making more efficient use of existing or underused assets in
the school impact district through school redistricting.

The analyses specified in paragraphs (3) and
(6) shall be periodically updated pursuant to section 302A-1612(b). [L 2007, c
245, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 188, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next